lt-LT: Akumuliatoriaus atsarginis palaikymas: Įtraukta; Nepalaikoma; Neprivaloma; Kita
en: Battery backup support: Included; Not supported; Optional; Other
hr-HR: Podrška za rezervnu bateriju: Uključeno; Nije podržano; Opcionalno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Podpora záložnej batérie: Súčasť balenia; Nie je podporované; Voliteľné; Iné
cs: Podpora záložního napájení z baterie: Zahrnuto; Nepodporováno; Volitelné; Jiné
zh-TW: 電池備援支援: 隨附; 不支援; 可選; 其他
es: Compatibilidad con batería de respaldo: Incluido; No compatible; Opcional; Otros
it: Supporto batteria di riserva: Incluso; Non supportata; Opzionale; Altro
ro-RO: Susținere de rezervă pentru baterie: Inclus; Neacceptat; Opțional; Altele
zh-CN: 支持电池备份: 包含; 不支持; 可选配; 其他
fi: Akun varmuuskopio tuki: Sisältyy; Ei tuettu; Valinnainen; Muu
ja: バッテリーバックアップのサポート: 含む; 非対応; オプション; その他
sv: Stöd för batteribackup: Ingår; Stöds inte; Valfri; Övrigt
el: Υποστήριξη εφεδρικής μπαταρίας: Συμπεριλαμβάνεται; Δεν υποστηρίζεται; Προαιρετικό; Άλλο
ko: 배터리 백업 지원 여부: 포함됨; 지원되지 않음; 옵션; 기타
bg-BG: Поддръжка на резервно захранване от батерия: Включено; Не се поддържа; По избор; Друго
nl: Ondersteuning voor batterijback-up: Inbegrepen; Niet ondersteund; Optioneel; Overig
th: การรองรับระบบสำรองไฟจากแบตเตอรี่: มีให้ในชุด; ไม่รองรับ; เลือกได้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Suporte por bateria de reserva: Incluído; Não suportado; Opcional; Outro
de: Unterstützung für Notstromversorgung: Inklusive; Nicht unterstützt; Optional; Sonstiges
ru: Поддержка резервного аккумулятора: Включено; Не поддерживается; Опционально; Другое
pl: Obsługa zasilania awaryjnego: W zestawie; Nieobsługiwane; Opcjonalne; Pozostałe
tr: Yedek pil desteği: Dahil; Desteklenmiyor; İsteğe bağlı; Diğer
sl-SI: Podpora za rezervno baterijo: Vključeno; Ni podprto; Po želji; Druga
pt-BR: Suporte para bateria de reserva: Incluído; Não compatível; Opcional; Outro
da: Understøttelse af batteribackup: Inkluderet; Ikke understøttet; Valgfrit; Andet
hu: Akkumulátor biztonsági támogatás: Tartozék; Nem támogatott; Opcionális; Egyéb
fr: Prise en charge de la batterie de secours: Inclus; Non pris en charge; Facultatif; Autre
vi: Hỗ trợ pin dự phòng: Đã bao gồm; Không hỗ trợ; Tùy chọn; Khác
nb: Støtte for reservebatteri: Inkludert; Ikke støttet; Valgfritt; Annet